Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 175B Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority

175B.005.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a structure for the construction, operation, financing, and oversight of significant transportation projects within the Commonwealth and between the Commonwealth and any state adjoining the Commonwealth. To accomplish this purpose, the Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority is established by KRS

175B.015

to review, approve, and monitor all projects eligible for construction and financing under this chapter and, if necessary, to assist with the operation, financing, and management of projects.

All projects approved by the Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority may be operated, managed, constructed, and financed entirely or in part only by:

A bi-state authority as provided in KRS

175B.030

;

A project authority as provided in KRS

175B.035

;

A public-private partnership as provided in KRS

175B.030

and

175B.037

; or

A state authority as provided in KRS

175B.020

, 175B.030, and

175B.037

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 75, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 6, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Authority” means the state authority, or a bi-state authority, or a project authority, unless the specific use requires that it apply only to the state authority, or a bi-state authority, or a project authority;

“Bi-state authority” means an authority created under KRS

175B.030

;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Cost” means:

The cost of construction of the project, including the acquisition of land, rights-of-way, property, rights in land, easements, and interests acquired by the authority for construction of a project;

The cost of preparing land or property, including demolishing or removing any buildings or structures, and the cost of acquiring any lands to which those buildings or structures may be moved;

The pro-rata value of all machinery and equipment used in construction of the project;

Financing charges and provisions for working capital in an amount the authority determines to be reasonable;

Interest prior to and during construction and, if approved by the authority, for a period up to two (2) years after completion of construction;

The cost of traffic estimates and of engineering, financial and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and revenues, or other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing any project;

The cost and expense of the relocation or removal of public utilities impacted by a project, including the cost of installing the facilities in a new location, the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands, and the cost of any other rights acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal;

Administrative expenses and any other expenses that are necessary for or incidental to the construction of a project, the financing of the construction, and the placing of the project in operation; and

The cost of maintenance of the completed project.

Any obligation or expense incurred by and reimbursed to the Commonwealth in connection with any of the items of cost set out in this subsection may be regarded as a part of that cost;

“Department” means the Department of Highways;

“Developing authority” means the authority involved in the development of a project;

“Issuing authority” means the authority that will issue or has issued debt associated with a project;

“Local government” means a consolidated local government, an urban-county government, a charter county government, a unified local government, or a county;

“Private partner” means any entity that is a partner in a public-private partnership other than:

The Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Any political subdivision of the Commonwealth;

The federal government;

Any other state government;

Any agency of a state, federal, or local government; or

An authority;

“Project” means:

Any highway or section of a highway designated as part of, or built to the standards of, the federal interstate highway system and that would be designated a major project by the Federal Highway Administration; or

Any fully or partially controlled highway or section of a fully or partially controlled highway not designated as part of, or built to the standards of, the federal interstate highway system, that exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in total cost;

with funding authorized by the plan enacted pursuant to KRS 48.300(2)(b);

“Project” includes all bridges, tollhouses, garages, and other buildings and facilities which the authority deems necessary for the operation of the project, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests which may be acquired by the authority or by the Commonwealth for the construction and operation of a project;

“Project authority” means an authority created pursuant to KRS

175B.035

;

“Project revenue bonds” means revenue funding bonds, revenue refunding bonds, notes, or other financial obligations issued under this chapter by the issuing authority;

“Public-private partnership” means an entity operating pursuant to a written public-private partnership agreement, and composed of:

An authority or authorities;

At least one (1) private partner;

The cabinet, if necessary; and

An adjoining state, if necessary, if the public-private partnership is financing a project that is between the Commonwealth and an adjoining state;

“Public utility facilities” means tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility in, on, along, over, or under any project; and

“State authority” means the Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority created under KRS

175B.015

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 76, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 7, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.015.
Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority — Members — Meetings — Records — Administrative regulations — Model procurement code compliance.

The Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority is hereby established as an independent de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth constituting a governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth. The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that in carrying out its functions, powers, and duties as prescribed in this chapter, the state authority will be performing essential public and government functions that improve the public welfare and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth by promoting the availability of and enhancing accessibility to improved transportation services within the Commonwealth.

The state authority shall be composed of the following eleven (11) voting members:

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or the secretary’s designee;

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet;

A representative of the Kentucky Association of Counties, to be appointed by the Governor;

A representative of the Kentucky County Judges/Executive Association, to be appointed by the Governor;

A representative of the Kentucky League of Cities, to be appointed by the Governor; and

Six (6) citizen members to be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS

11.160

, at least two (2) of whom shall be familiar with road and bridge design or the financing and administration of transportation infrastructure projects; and

Each Kentucky member who shares duties as a presiding officer of a bi-state authority pursuant to KRS 175B.030(4)(a)3. shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member.

The ex officio members shall serve for the term of their respective offices.

Members appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(a)3. to 6. of this section shall begin their terms on October 1, 2009, and shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years; however, in making initial appointments, the members appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(a)6. of this section shall include two (2) members for a term of two (2) years, two (2) members for a term of three (3) years, and two (2) members for a term of four (4) years.

Vacancies occurring during the term of any member shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The members of the state authority shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessary and incidental to the performance of their duties and functions as members of the state authority.

Members of the state authority shall be considered public servants subject to KRS Chapter 11A.

The following individuals or entities shall be prohibited from entering into any contract or agreement with the state authority:

Any member of the state authority, a project authority, or a bi-state authority;

Any spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, or sibling of a member of the state authority, a project authority, or a bi-state authority; and

Any corporation, limited liability entity, or other business entity of which a person identified in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph is an owner, member, or partner or has any other ownership interest.

The chairman of the state authority shall be the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet.

The members of the state authority shall elect a vice chairman and a secretary from the membership.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide fiscal consultant services to the state authority.

The state authority shall hold its initial meeting no later than November 1, 2009, and shall meet as needed thereafter, with adequate notice at the call of the chair. A quorum of at least fifty percent (50%) of the members of the state authority must be present for the state authority to take any action. At least eight (8) members shall vote in the affirmative for the state authority to approve a new project. All other business shall be approved by a majority vote of the members present.

The state authority shall be attached for administrative purposes to the Transportation Cabinet. The state authority shall establish and maintain an office, and the secretary of the state authority shall maintain complete records of the state authority’s actions and proceedings as public records open to inspection.

The state authority shall employ staff as needed in the conduct of its duties and functions, and shall fix their compensation.

The state authority may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as needed:

Establishing collection and enforcement procedures, including fines, charges, assessments, and other enforcement mechanisms, for the violation of KRS 175B.040(4), and for violation of any administrative regulation promulgated under this subsection;

Establishing an appeals process by which a person may contest a violation of KRS 175B.040(4), or a violation of any administrative regulation promulgated under this subsection, by way of an administrative hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;

Relating to any matters necessary to the efficient administration of tolls when implemented for a project developed under this chapter; and

To fulfill any other requirements of this chapter.

The state authority shall comply with applicable provisions of KRS Chapter 45A in the development of a project and the procurement of goods and services.

The records of the state authority shall be considered open records pursuant to KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

The meetings of the state authority shall be considered open meetings pursuant to KRS

61.805

to

61.850

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 77, effective June 26, 2009; 2013, ch. 38, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 132, § 7, effective March 27, 2017.

175B.020.
Purpose of state authority — Participation as a developing or issuing authority — Oversight function — Legislative ratification required for certain actions — Administrative regulation regarding fee.

The state authority’s primary purpose shall be to facilitate the construction, financing, operation, and oversight of projects by entering into bi-state agreements and by creating bi-state authorities, project authorities, and public-private partnerships. To accomplish these purposes, the state authority shall have the power and duty to:

Take the following actions relating to a bi-state authority authorized pursuant to KRS

175B.030

:

To enter into a bi-state agreement;

To review and approve project financing plans and development agreements; and

To monitor agreements entered into by bi-state authorities;

Take the following actions relating to a project authority authorized pursuant to KRS

175B.035

:

To request establishment of a project authority;

To review and approve project financing plans and development agreements;

To monitor activities of project authorities; and

To enter into an agreement with the project authority; and

Take the following actions relating to a public-private partnership authorized pursuant to KRS

175B.037

:

To request establishment of a public-private partnership;

To review and approve project financing plans;

To monitor activities of public-private partnerships; and

To enter into an agreement as a part of or with a public-private partnership, if necessary.

The state authority, when authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, may participate as a developing or issuing authority, or both, in the development, construction, or financing of a project by a bi-state or project authority, or by a public-private partnership, if necessary. If the state authority participates as a developing or issuing authority, the state authority shall have the powers and duties established in KRS

175B.025

as they apply to that project.

The state authority, as a function of its oversight of any other authority created pursuant to this chapter, shall report before the first issuance of bonds and no less than semiannually thereafter to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue of the Legislative Research Commission, on any projects currently proposed or under development by each authority. Current and proposed levels of bonding for each project shall be reviewed by the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee in accordance with KRS

45.794

before the bonds shall be issued.

The state authority, when proposing a project pursuant to this chapter, shall to the extent practical consult with the officials representing the units of local government in which the proposed project is to be located in order to obtain the advice and input on the local impact of the proposed project, including information regarding land use planning, transportation planning, economic development, and any other factors having a direct impact to the local community.

The state authority may receive an unsolicited proposal if the proposal contains:

An executive summary of no more than three (3) pages that details the revenue source for the proposed project, the amount of revenue expected to be generated by the project, and the project costs;

A certification from a financial expert stating that the contents of the unsolicited proposal are true and correct; and

A fee for the review of the executive summary.

The state authority shall respond to a person offering an unsolicited proposal notifying the person that the proposal has been rejected or approved for further review.

If the state authority approves an unsolicited proposal for further review, the state authority shall independently verify that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth.

If the state authority approves a proposal for further review, the person making the unsolicited proposal shall pay all costs of evaluating the unsolicited proposal incurred by the state authority and the cabinet pursuant to an agreement negotiated between the state authority and the person making the unsolicited proposal.

If the state authority and the cabinet agree that an unsolicited proposal is in the best interest of the Commonwealth, the state authority, with the assistance of the cabinet, shall begin a competitive procurement process to implement some or all of the concepts contained in the unsolicited proposal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following actions shall not take effect until ratified by the General Assembly:

The creation of a bi-state authority;

The creation of a project authority;

The creation of a public-private partnership;

The modification or amendment of the scope of any project; and

The development of any project undertaken entirely by the state authority.

If any action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is not ratified by the General Assembly, the creation, approval, or modification shall be considered void.

The state authority shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to determine the fee required by subsection (5)(c) of this section for the review of the executive summary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 78, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 8, effective April 8, 2016; 2017 ch. 132, § 8, effective March 27, 2017.

175B.025.
Powers and duties of developing authority and issuing authority — Project development restrictions.

The developing authority and issuing authority may be the same authority or separate authorities, depending on the needs of the project. The developing authority and issuing authority shall have the following powers and duties, as necessary to complete, operate, and maintain the project, subject to the limitations provided in KRS 175B.020(10):

To enter into agreements as necessary to facilitate the development, construction, maintenance, operation, repair, or financing of projects;

To directly or indirectly construct, reconstruct, maintain, repair, operate, and regulate projects within the Commonwealth, or contract with another entity for these services;

To issue project revenue bonds of the issuing authority payable solely from the tolls, revenues, rentals, funds from any grant anticipation revenue vehicle (GARVEE), funds appropriated by the state or federal government, and any other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying all or any cost of a project, and to refund any of its bonds;

To fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for transit over any project constructed by it, and for any ancillary or connector routes affected by the project.

No tolls shall be authorized by any developing or issuing authority as a part of any development agreement or any financial plan for:

Any project involving the federal interstate highway system that connects the Commonwealth with the State of Ohio; or

Any project constituting a fully or partially controlled highway, whether or not involving the federal interstate highway system, that connects the Commonwealth with the State of Ohio, including but not limited to a qualifying highway that constitutes a bypass of a major metropolitan area;

To establish and enforce rules and regulations for the use of a project;

To acquire and hold any of the following in the name of the developing authority, and to dispose of them as the developing authority deems necessary:

Real and personal property, including lands and structures;

Rights;

Rights-of-way;

Franchises;

Easements and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights; and

Any other item or asset necessary to accomplish its mission;

To designate the locations and establish, limit, and control points of access to the project, and to prohibit access to the project from any undesignated point;

To make and enter into contracts and agreements in the performance of duties and the execution of powers under this chapter;

To employ any consultants and to fix their compensation;

To receive and accept contributions and grants from any source for or in aid of the construction of a project or the operation of the developing or issuing authority;

To accept interest rate subsidies, rebates, tax credits, or guarantees as provided in the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, or as may be provided in subsequent federal legislation providing support to or credit enhancement of governmental obligations;

To expend any funds provided under this chapter in advertising the facilities and services of a project to the traveling public;

To enter into lease agreements with the department; and

To do acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

Projects may be developed in conjunction with other road development efforts of the Commonwealth that are in compliance with Federal Highway Administration requirements.

Projects developed pursuant to this chapter shall:

Comply with the requirements of KRS Chapters 45A, 174, and 176;

Be included in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan; and

Comply with all relevant requirements of the Federal Highway Administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 79, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 14, effective April 8, 2016.

175B.030.
Projects connecting Kentucky and an adjoining state — Bi-state authority — Formation — Members — Bi-state agreement — Financial plan — Legislative findings and declarations — Approval of project connecting Kentucky and Ohio.

This section shall apply to any project that connects Kentucky with any state that adjoins the Commonwealth. A proposal to construct a project that connects Kentucky with an adjoining state shall be contained in a financing plan prepared pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. If approved, the project shall be constructed under the supervision of the state authority, a bi-state authority, or both, and may be financed by the state authority, a bi-state authority, a public-private partnership, or any combination of these.
(1) (a) 1. This section shall apply to any project that connects Kentucky with any state that adjoins the Commonwealth. A proposal to construct a project that connects Kentucky with an adjoining state shall be contained in a financing plan prepared pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. If approved, the project shall be constructed under the supervision of the state authority, a bi-state authority, or both, and may be financed by the state authority, a bi-state authority, a public-private partnership, or any combination of these.

If the state authority, operating pursuant to KRS

175B.020

, participates in any capacity in the construction or financing of a project that connects Kentucky with an adjoining state, the state authority may assume all or part of the role of the bi-state authority relative to that project.

Subsections (2) to (4) of this section shall only apply to a bi-state authority.

Subsections (1) and (5) to (8) of this section shall apply to both a bi-state authority and a public-private partnership.

A local government that contains a portion of a proposed project may, by resolution of its governing body, request that its chief executive officer and the Governor appoint a group of Kentucky members to negotiate with a similar group from an adjoining state for the purpose of proposing the creation of a bi-state authority composed of members from both states, recognized under the laws of both states, and existing for the purpose of financing, constructing, and operating a project or projects mutually beneficial to both states.

If established, the Kentucky membership of the bi-state authority shall consist of seven (7) members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, and four (4) of whom shall be appointed by the chief executive of the local government in which the project is located. The four (4) local government appointees shall be residents of the county in which the project is located. If a project is located in a consolidated local government, no more than two (2) appointees shall reside in the same Kentucky senatorial district. If portions of the project are located in more than one (1) local government, the chief executive of the county or consolidated local government having the largest population shall make the appointments authorized in this paragraph.

Any proposed agreement to establish a bi-state authority shall be presented to the state authority for approval. If the state authority approves the agreement, it shall be submitted to the General Assembly for ratification. If the agreement is ratified by the General Assembly, the state authority shall authorize the establishment of a bi-state authority and shall enter into an agreement with the adjoining state for the creation of a bi-state authority.

Kentucky members of a proposed bi-state authority who are appointed by the Governor shall be confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS

11.160

. Members appointed by the chief executive of the local government shall be confirmed by the governing body of the local government.

At least two (2) of the Governor’s appointees and two (2) of the chief executive’s appointees shall be familiar with road and bridge design or financing and administration of transportation infrastructure projects.

Members of a bi-state authority appointed by the Governor shall serve for four (4) years, except that initial appointments shall be as follows:

One (1) appointee shall serve a term of two (2) years;

One (1) appointee shall serve a term of three (3) years; and

One (1) appointee shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The governing body of the local government requesting formation of the bi-state authority shall, by resolution, establish term lengths for the initial and succeeding members who are locally appointed, with each term not to exceed four (4) years.

Members of a bi-state authority representing the Commonwealth may be reappointed upon the expiration of their terms. Members reappointed shall be reconfirmed in the same manner as newly appointed members.

An agreement establishing a bi-state authority shall at a minimum:

Establish the total number of members of the bi-state authority;

Establish staffing and funding to support the work of the bi-state authority;

Designate the process for selecting a presiding officer of the bi-state authority, which shall include a requirement that a member from each state share the duties of presiding; and

Require the approval of a majority of the members from each state before any action may be taken or any change may be made by the bi- state authority.

A bi-state authority created pursuant to this section shall take the legal form necessary to conform to the laws of both states. The Commonwealth shall consider the bi-state authority to be an independent de jure municipal corporation, constituting a governmental agency and instrumentality of the appropriate jurisdictions. The bi-state authority shall adopt a name indicative of its location and purpose.

Any bi-state agreement approved pursuant to this section may be presented to the United States Congress for consent thereof by joint resolution as provided in Article 1, Section 10, Clause 3 of the United States Constitution.

Members of a bi-state authority appointed from the Commonwealth shall be considered public servants subject to KRS Chapter 11A.

Members of a bi-state authority appointed from the Commonwealth shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessary and incidental to the performance of their duties and functions as members of the bi-state authority.

The following individuals or entities shall be prohibited from entering into any contract or agreement with a bi-state authority or a public-private partnership:

Any member of the bi-state authority appointed to represent the Commonwealth or any member of the state authority, a project authority, or a public-private partnership;

Any spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, or sibling of a member of the bi-state authority appointed to represent the Commonwealth or any spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, or sibling of a member of the state authority, a project authority, or a public-private partnership; and

Any corporation, limited liability entity, or other business entity of which a person identified in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph is an owner, member, or partner or has any other ownership interest.

A bi-state authority or public-private partnership shall comply with the procurement laws of both states that are a party to the agreement creating the bi-state authority or public-private partnership, including the provisions of KRS Chapter 45A, in the development of a project and the procurement of goods and services.

A bi-state authority or public-private partnership shall comply with the laws of both states concerning the inspection and disclosure of public records, including KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

A bi-state authority or public-private partnership shall comply with the laws of both states concerning the conduct of open meetings, including KRS

61.805

to

61.850

.

Prior to the execution of any agreements for the construction of the project, the state authority, the bi-state authority, a public-private partnership, or any combination of these, if appropriate, shall prepare a financial plan specifying the construction and financing parameters of the project, including:

A timeline for construction of the project, including financing requirements throughout the construction of the project;

The amount and duration of per-vehicle tolls;

Expected appropriations from the General Assembly to be used for project costs; however, no financial plan shall be submitted or approved which seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan;

Other sources of funds and expected amounts; and

Other provisions relating to the construction and financing of the project.

If the financial plan is prepared by a bi-state authority, the Kentucky members of the bi-state authority shall consult with the involved local governments in Kentucky, the department, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Office of Financial Management, during the development of the financial plan. Upon completion and approval of the financial plan by the bi-state authority, the plan shall be submitted to the state authority for approval.

If the financial plan is prepared by the state authority, the state authority shall consult with the involved local governments in Kentucky, the department, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Office of Financial Management, during the development of the financial plan. If the financial plan is viable based on all information available to the state authority, the state authority shall recommend the plan.

If the financial plan is prepared by a public-private partnership, the public-private partnership shall consult with the involved local governments in Kentucky, the department, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Office of Financial Management, during the development of the financial plan. Upon completion and approval of the financial plan by the public-private partnership, the plan shall be submitted to the state authority for approval.

The state authority shall not approve or recommend a financial plan which seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan. If the financial plan is approved or recommended by the state authority, the cabinet and, as necessary, other state agencies or local governments may enter into a development agreement as provided in subsection (7) of this section with all necessary parties for the development of a project.

Every financial plan prepared pursuant to this section shall include an evaluation of the ability of a potential contractor or service provider to quickly respond to the needs presented in a major transportation project, and the importance of economic development opportunities represented by the construction of any project under this chapter. In evaluating proposals, preference shall be given to a plan that includes the involvement of small businesses as subcontractors, to the extent that small businesses can provide services in a competitive manner, unless any preference interferes with the qualification for federal funds.

Upon approval or recommendation of the financial plan as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a development agreement may be entered into establishing the terms and conditions under which a project will be undertaken and the duties, responsibilities, powers, and authorities of the parties to the agreement. The development agreement shall, at a minimum:

Require the bi-state authority or public-private partnership to submit an annual report to the cabinet and the Legislative Research Commission;

Require that an annual audit of the bi-state authority or public-private partnership be performed by a certified public accountant;

Include the relevant provisions from the financial plan required by subsection (6) of this section;

Include provisions detailing the duties, responsibilities, and obligations of each party in relation to the financing, development, operation, and maintenance of the project, and the servicing and retirement of all bonds;

Establish limits on any reserve funds created for operation, maintenance, or bond servicing, which shall be at a level to adequately operate and maintain the project and ensure proper bond servicing;

Prohibit the amendment of the project or the financial plan without the prior evaluation and approval by the state authority. No amendment shall be approved that seeks or purports to bind any future General Assembly to appropriate any moneys beyond those appropriated in the most recently enacted biennial highway construction plan;

If applicable, establish a process for the transfer of ownership of the portion of the project that is within the Commonwealth to the Commonwealth upon retirement of all bonds associated with the project or, if the project utilizes a public-private partnership, upon termination of that partnership; and

For a bi-state authority, require the approval of a majority of the members from each state before any action may be taken or any changes may be made by the bi-state authority; or

For a public-private partnership, require approval of the cabinet before any action may be taken or any changes may be made by the public-private partnership.

The parties to the agreement from the Commonwealth shall consult with the department and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Office of Financial Management, in the development of the agreement.

Additional agreements may be executed, as necessary to complete the project.

The development agreement may take the form of a public-private partnership agreement.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties as prescribed in this chapter, a bi-state authority or public- private partnership authorized under this section will be performing essential public and government functions that improve the public welfare and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth by promoting the availability of and enhancing accessibility to improved transportation services within the Commonwealth.

The state authority shall not enter into a public-private partnership related to a project connecting the Commonwealth with the State of Ohio unless the General Assembly expressly authorizes it by passing a joint resolution.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 80, effective June 26, 2009; 2016 ch. 67, § 9, effective April 8, 2016; 2017 ch. 132, § 9, effective March 27, 2017.